Mississippi statutes. Title 93. Domestic Relations
Chapter 7. Annulment of Marriage

§ 93-7-1.
Annulment of void marriages.

All bigamous or incestuous marriages are void, and a declaration of nullity may be obtained at the suit of either party.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2748-01; Laws, 1962, ch. 278, § 1, eff from and after 60 days after passage (approved May 16, 1962).

§ 93-7-3.
Causes for annulment of marriages.

A marriage may be annulled for any one (1) of the following causes existing at the time of the marriage ceremony:

Incurable impotency.

Adjudicated mental illness or incompetence of either or both parties. Action of a spouse who has been adjudicated mentally ill or incompetent may be brought by guardian, or in the absence of a guardian, by next friend, provided that the suit is brought within six (6) months after marriage.

Failure to comply with the provisions of Sections 93-1-5 through 93-1-9 when any marriage affected by that failure has not been followed by cohabitation.

Or, in the absence of ratification:

When either of the parties to a marriage is incapable, from want of age or understanding, of consenting to any marriage, or is incapable from physical causes of entering into the marriage state, or where the consent of either party has been obtained by force or fraud, the marriage shall be void from the time its nullity is declared by a court of competent jurisdiction.

Pregnancy of the wife by another person, if the husband did not know of the pregnancy.

Suits for annulment under paragraphs (d) and (e) shall be brought within six (6) months after the ground for annulment is or should be discovered, and not thereafter.

The causes for annulment of marriage set forth in this section are intended to be new remedies and shall in no way affect the causes for divorce declared elsewhere to be the law of the State of Mississippi as they presently exist or as they may from time to time be amended.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2748-02; Laws, 1962, ch. 278, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 442, § 28, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 93-7-5.
Legitimation of issue.

Except for incestuous marriages, the issue of the parties to a void marriage conceived subsequent to the date thereof is legitimate, whether the marriage be declared void because of a prior existing marriage, or is annulled for some other cause.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2748-03; Laws, 1962, ch. 278, § 3, eff from and after 60 days after passage (approved May 16, 1962).

§ 93-7-7.
Custody of children.

When an annulment shall be adjudged or a marriage declared void, the chancery court may, in its discretion, having regard to the circumstances of the parties and the nature of the case, as may seem equitable and just, make all orders touching the care, custody, and maintenance of the children of the marriage; and the court may, afterwards, on complaint, change the judgment and make from time to time such new judgment as the case may require.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2748-04; Laws, 1962, ch. 278, § 4; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 137, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 93-7-9.
Filing of complaint.

The complaint for annulment shall be filed in the county where the defendant resides, or in the county where the marriage license was issued, or in the county where the plaintiff resides, if the defendant be a nonresident of this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2748-05; Laws, 1962, ch. 278, § 5; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 138, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 93-7-11.
Jurisdiction; pleading; process.

The chancery courts of the State of Mississippi shall have jurisdiction to hear and determine all suits for annulment and all suits for annulment shall be tried in term time or vacation, and the same rules of pleading and procedure shall apply as in divorce cases, and the laws of process now in force in divorce cases in this state shall apply in all suits for annulment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2748-06; Laws, 1962, ch. 278, § 6, eff from and after 60 days after passage (approved May 16, 1962).

§ 93-7-13.
Duty of court to make report.

It shall be the duty of the chancery clerk to make a report of each annulment granted in his county to the state board of health on forms furnished by the state board of health in the same manner as now required by law for reporting divorces.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2748-06; Laws, 1962, ch. 278, § 6, eff from and after 60 days after passage (approved May 16, 1962).